Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201648-3301
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-3301 to 48-3305 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

Laws 2016, LB1110, § 1.
April 14, 2016